Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202549-14,126
Commission; violation; orders; civil penalty; costs of hearing; providing information regarding certain violations; reward; contingency.

(1) The commission, upon finding that there has been a violation of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, may issue an order requiring the violator to do one or more of the following:

(a) Cease and desist from the violation;

(b) File any report, statement, or other information as required;

(c) Pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for each violation of the act, rule, or regulation; or

(d) Pay the costs of the hearing in a contested case if the violator did not appear at the hearing personally or by counsel.

(2) Upon finding that there has been a violation of subdivision (1)(a)(vi) or (1)(b) or subsection (2) of section 49-1480, the commission shall issue an order paying any person who provided the commission information that resulted in the finding of such violation a sum of fifty thousand dollars. Such payment shall be contingent upon the commission recovering any civil penalty sought under subsection (3) of section 49-1480.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 126;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 19;

Laws 2006, LB 188, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB464, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB176, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 32;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 67;

Laws 2025, LB644, § 24.